Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB471.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9304 of Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 9304. Grants to veterans' service officer programs.* * *(a.1) Transfer.--The sum of $1,000,000 is transferred from the General Fund to the department for use under this section.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213